District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.09

Other claims against dissolved limited liability partnership.

(a)

A dissolved limited liability partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

(b)

A notice under subsection (a) of this section must:

(1)

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the District of Columbia, or, if the principal office is not located in the District of Columbia, in the appropriate court where the partnership’s principal office is or was last located;

(2)

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

(3)

State that a claim against the partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than 3 years after publication of the notice; and

(4)

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability partnership, state that if a claim against the partnership is barred, any corresponding claim against any partner or person dissociated as a partner which is based on § 29-603.06 is also barred.

(c)

If a dissolved limited liability partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the partnership not later than 3 years after the publication date of the notice:

(1)

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under § 29-608.08;

(2)

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the partnership but not acted on; and

(3)

A claimant whose claim is contingent on or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(d)

A claim not barred under this section or § 29-608.08(c) may be enforced as follows:

(1)

Against a dissolved limited liability partnership, a claim may be enforced to the extent of its undistributed assets;

(2)

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-608.10(d), if assets of the partnership have been distributed after dissolution, a claim may be enforced against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or of the partnership’s assets distributed to the partner or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person’s total liability for all claims under this paragraph may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution; and

(3)

A claim may be enforced against any person liable on the claim under § 29-603.06, 29-607.03, or 29-608.06.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(I), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
This section is referenced in § 29-604.05, § 29-608.10, § 29-608.11, and § 29-610.02.